Hawaii, session 2026, HB624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that properly licensed school psychologists provide effective services to help children and youth succeed academically, socially, behaviorally, and emotionally by providing direct educational and mental health services, as well as working with parents, educators, and other professionals to create supportive learning and social environments for all children. The legislature further finds that Hawaii is the only state without certification or licensure for school psychologists.  A dialogue on how to create a pathway for the licensure of school psychologists is needed to ensure that functioning school psychologists are properly qualified and delivering appropriate services. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to create a school psychologists working group within the department of education to recommend actionable steps or propose legislation to the legislature on an immediate pathway to licensure for school psychologists in 2026. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the department of education a school psychologists working group to recommend actionable steps for, or propose legislation on, an immediate pathway to licensure for school psychologists that can be acted upon in 2026. (b)  The working group shall consist of: (1)  The superintendent of education, or the superintendent's designee; (2)  The director of commerce and consumer affairs, or the director's designee; and (3)  The attorney general, or the attorney general's designee. (c)  The working group shall select a chairperson from among the members listed in subsection (b). (d)  The chairperson shall invite the following individuals to become members of the working group: (1)  A representative from the Hawaii Association of School Psychologists; (2)  A representative from the National Association of School Psychologists; (3)  A representative from the Board of Psychology; (4)  A representative from the Hawaii Psychological Association; and (5)  Any other individuals, including representatives from state agencies, stakeholders, or advocates, as recommended by a majority of the working group. (e)  Members of the working group shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (f)  The working group shall submit a report of its findings, recommendations, and any proposed legislation to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (g)  The working group shall cease to exist on July 31, 2026. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.